North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 3. Electronic Notarial Acts, Powers, and Limitations.

§ 10B-115.
Types of electronic notarial acts.

The following types of notarial acts may be performed electronically:

Acknowledgments;

Jurats;

Verifications or proofs; and

Oaths or affirmations.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-116.
Prohibitions.

An electronic notarization shall not be performed if the signer of the electronic document:

Is not in the presence of the electronic notary at the time of notarization; and

Is not personally known to the notary or identified by the evidence in accordance with other provisions of this Chapter; or

For any reason set forth in

G.S. 10B-20

.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-117.
Notarial components of electronic document.

In performing an electronic notarial act, all of the following components shall be attached to, or logically associated with, the electronic document by the electronic notary, all of which shall be immediately perceptible and reproducible in the electronic record to which the notary’s electronic signature is attached:

The notary’s name, state, and county of commissioning exactly as stated on the commission issued by the Secretary;

The words “Electronic Notary Public”;

The words “State of North Carolina”;

The expiration date of the commission;

The notary’s electronic signature; and

The completed wording of one of the following notarial certificates:

Acknowledgment;

Jurat;

Verification or proof; or

Oath or affirmation.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-118.
Maximum fees.

For performing electronic notarial acts, the maximum fees that may be charged by an electronic notary are as follows:

For acknowledgments, $10.00 per signature.

For jurats, $10.00 per signature.

For verifications or proofs, $10.00 per signature.

For oaths or affirmations, $10.00 per signature.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§§ 10B-119 through 10B-124.

Reserved for future codification purposes.